Virginia statutes. Title 33.2. Highways and Other Surface Transportation Systems.
Article 3. Secondary State Highway System.
§ 33.2-336.
Funds allocated to counties for Rural Addition Program; street standards.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the Board and the Commissioner of Highways shall not diminish funds allocated or allocable to any county for use under the Rural Addition Program by reason of any county ordinance authorizing the use of private roads not built to standards set by the Department or construction of subdivision streets built to standards other than those established by the Department.

In those counties where this section is applicable, the ordinance shall also state that any and all streets that are not constructed to meet the standards necessary for inclusion in the systems of state highways shall be privately maintained and shall not be eligible for acceptance into the systems of state highways unless improved to current Department standards with funds other than those appropriated by the General Assembly and allocated by the Board. For any street that is not constructed to Department standards, the subdivision plat and all approved deeds of subdivision, or similar instruments, shall contain a statement advertising that the streets in the subdivision do not meet the standards necessary for inclusion in the systems of state highways and will not be maintained by the Department or the county approving the subdivision and are not eligible for rural addition funds, as defined in §

33.2-335

, or any other funds appropriated by the General Assembly and allocated by the Board.

History.

2006, c. 566, § 33.1-72.2; 2014, c. 805.

Editor’s note.

At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, Acts 2006, c. 566, was codified as § 33.1-72.2, the precursor to this section.

Research References.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 16-526 Deed of Subdivision, Dedication, and Easement, et seq.

§ 33.2-337.
Contributions to primary or secondary state highway construction by counties.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any county having highways in the primary or secondary state highway system may contribute funds annually for the construction of primary or secondary highways. The funds contributed by such county shall be appropriated from the county’s general revenues for use by the Department on the primary or secondary state highway system within such county as may be determined by the board of supervisors of such county in cooperation with the Department. The funds to which any county may be entitled under the provisions of §

33.2-358

for construction, improvement, or maintenance of primary or secondary highways shall not be diminished by reason of any funds contributed for that purpose by such county or by any person or entity, regardless of whether such contributions are matched by state or federal funds.

History.

1977, c. 578, § 33.1-75.2; 1982, c. 218; 2014, c. 805; 2015, c. 684.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 684 substituted “§

33.2-358

” for “§§

33.2-358

,

33.2-361

, and

33.2-364

” in the third sentence.

§ 33.2-338.
Construction and improvement of primary or secondary highways by counties.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this article, the governing body of any county may expend general revenues or revenues derived from the sale of bonds for the purpose of constructing or improving highways, including curbs, gutters, drainageways, sound barriers, sidewalks, and all other features or appurtenances conducive to the public safety and convenience, that either have been or may be taken into the primary or secondary state highway system. Project planning and the acquisition of rights-of-way shall be under the control and at the direction of the county, subject to the approval of project plans and specifications by the Department. All costs incurred by the Department in administering such contracts shall be reimbursed from the county’s general revenues or from revenues derived from the sale of bonds or such costs may be charged against the funds that the county may be entitled to under the provisions of §

33.2-358

.

Projects undertaken under the authority of subsection A shall not diminish the funds to which a county may be entitled under the provisions of §

33.2-357

or

33.2-358

.

At the request of the county, the Department may agree to undertake the design, right-of-way acquisition, or construction of projects funded by the county. In such situations, the Department and the county shall enter into an agreement specifying all relevant procedures and responsibilities concerning the design, right-of-way acquisition, construction, or contract administration of projects to be funded by the county. The county shall reimburse the Department for all costs incurred by the Department in carrying out the aforesaid activities from general revenues or revenues derived from the sale of bonds.

Notwithstanding any contrary provision of law, any county may undertake activities toward the design, land acquisition, or construction of primary or secondary state highway projects that have been included in the six-year plan pursuant to §

33.2-331

, or in the case of a primary state highway, an approved project included in the six-year improvement program of the Board. In such situations, the Department and the county shall enter into an agreement specifying all relevant procedures and responsibilities concerning the design, right-of-way acquisition, construction, or contract administration of projects to be funded by the Department. Such activities shall be undertaken with the prior concurrence of the Department, and the Department shall compensate the county for eligible expenses incurred in carrying out these activities. The county may undertake these activities in accordance with all applicable county procedures, provided the Commissioner of Highways finds that those county procedures are substantially similar to departmental procedures and specifications.

If funding for the construction of a primary or interstate project is scheduled in the Board’s Six-Year Improvement Program as defined in §

33.2-214

, a locality may choose to advance funds to the project. If such advance is offered, the Board may consider such request and agree to such advancement and the subsequent reimbursement of the locality of the advance in accordance with terms agreed upon by the Board or its designee and the locality.

Any county carrying out any construction project as authorized in this section may, in so doing, exercise the powers granted the Commissioner of Highways under Article 1 (§

33.2-1000

et seq.) of Chapter 10 to enter property for the purpose of making an examination and survey thereof, with a view to ascertainment of its suitability for highway purposes and any other purpose incidental thereto.

For the purposes of this section, any county without an existing franchise agreement, when administering a Department-sanctioned project under a land-use permit or transportation project agreement, shall have the same authority as the Department pertaining to the relocation of utilities.

Whenever so requested by any county, funding of any project undertaken as provided in this section may be supplemented solely by state funds in order to avoid the necessity of complying with additional federal requirements, provided a determination has been made by the Department that (i) adequate state funds are available to fully match available federal transportation funds and (ii) the Department can meet its federal obligation authority, as permitted by federal law.

History.

1981, c. 321, § 33.1-75.3; 1982, c. 218; 1983, cc. 321, 325; 1984, c. 127; 1985, c. 562; 1988, c. 654; 1989, c. 143; 1990, c. 36; 1995, c. 105; 1998, cc. 334, 341, 342; 2000, c. 88; 2003, c. 303; 2005, c. 342; 2006, cc. 115, 827; 2014, c. 805; 2015, c. 684; 2020, c. 784.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 684 deleted “33.2-361, or

33.2-364

” following “33.2-358” in the third sentence of subsection A; substituted “§

33.2-357

or

33.2-358

” for “§

33.2-357

,

33.2-358

,

33.2-361

, or

33.2-364

” in subsection B; and made stylistic changes.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 784, in subsection D, substituted “compensate the county for eligible” for “reimburse the county for” in the penultimate sentence and deleted the former penultimate sentence.

§ 33.2-339.
Maintenance, etc., of streets and highways in certain towns from secondary funds.

The Commissioner of Highways may, subject to the approval of the Board, upon request of the governing bodies of towns with a population of less than 3,500, according to the last United States census, select certain streets and highways in such towns for maintenance, improvement, construction, and reconstruction from allocations available from secondary highway funds not to exceed two miles of streets or highways in such towns included in the secondary state highway system, whether such two miles of streets or highways constitute connecting links between highways in the secondary state highway system in the counties or between highways in the secondary state highway system and highways in the primary state highway system, or not.

The Commissioner of Highways, with the approval of the Board, in addition to the said two miles may increase the mileage of streets and highways in such towns annually, not to exceed in any one year one-fourth mile, exclusive of any mileage transferred from the primary state highway system under the provisions of §

33.2-315

or any mileage maintained by the Department prior to its annexation by such town.

History.

Code 1950, § 33-50.1; 1954, c. 534; 1970, c. 322, § 33.1-79; 2014, c. 805.

§ 33.2-340.
Maintenance, etc., by Commissioner of Highways when no request for allocation.

If no request is made to the Board by the governing body of any town as provided in §

33.2-339

, the Commissioner of Highways, subject to the approval of the Board, may maintain, improve, construct, and reconstruct all streets in such town that (i) have an unrestricted right-of-way width of not less than 30 feet and a hard-surface width of not less than 12 feet; (ii) were established after July 1, 1950, by such town and have a right-of-way width of not less than 50 feet and a hard-surface width of not less than 20 feet; or (iii) are functionally classified as local streets and were constructed on or after January 1, 1996, and, at the time of approval by the town, met the criteria for pavement width and right-of-way of the then-current edition design standards for subdivision streets as set forth in regulations adopted by the Board.

History.

Code 1950; 1950, p. 162, § 33-50.4; 1970, c. 322, § 33.1-82; 1992, c. 108; 1999, c. 318; 2014, c. 805.

§ 33.2-341.
Maps of secondary state highway system.

The Commissioner of Highways shall prepare and keep on file in his office for public inspection a complete map for each county showing the route of the secondary state highway system.

History.

Code 1950, § 33-51; 1970, c. 322, § 33.1-84; 2014, c. 805.

§ 33.2-342.
Resumption of responsibility for secondary state highways by counties.

Notwithstanding any provisions of § 11 of Chapter 415 of the Acts of Assembly of 1932 and §§

33.2-341

,

33.2-343

,

33.2-345

, and

33.2-346

, the Commissioner of Highways, following receipt of a resolution adopted by the board of supervisors of a county requesting such action, may enter into an agreement with any county that desires to resume responsibility over all or any portion of the secondary state highway system within such county’s boundaries for the purposes of planning, constructing, maintaining, and operating such highways. Such agreement shall specify the equipment, facilities, personnel, and funding that will be provided to the county in order to implement such agreement’s provisions.

Any county that resumes full responsibility for all of the secondary state highway system within such county’s boundaries (i) shall have authority and control over the secondary state highway system within its boundaries, (ii) shall be deemed to have withdrawn from the secondary state highway system, and (iii) shall receive payments in accordance with §

33.2-366

. The resolution requesting resumption of all responsibilities shall also include a request for the transfer and release of all rights-of-way and rights of access along the secondary state highway system within the county’s boundaries.

History.

2001, cc. 257, 273, 277, § 33.1-84.1; 2009, c. 476; 2014, c. 805.

§ 33.2-343.
Return after withdrawal from secondary state highway system.

Any county that has withdrawn its roads from the secondary state highway system under the provisions of § 11 of Chapter 415 of the Acts of Assembly of 1932 shall have the right at any time to bring itself back within such secondary state highway system, provided the decision is approved by a majority of the qualified voters of such county voting in an election called for that purpose as provided in this article.

History.

Code 1950, § 33-53; 1970, c. 322, § 33.1-85; 2014, c. 805.

§ 33.2-344.
Election to determine return to the secondary state highway system.

Upon the petition of qualified voters of any county that proposes to return its roads to the secondary state highway system equal in number to at least 20 percent of the number counted in such county for presidential electors at the last preceding presidential election or 250, whichever is more, the circuit court of such county shall make an order requiring the judges of election on such day as may be fixed in the order, but not less than 30 days after the date of the order, to open a poll and take the sense of the qualified voters of the county on the question of whether or not such county shall return to the secondary state highway system. The qualifications of voters at each such election shall be as provided by §§

24.2-400

through

24.2-403

.

The ballots for use at any such election shall be printed to state the question as follows:

“Shall county (the name of such county to be inserted) return to the secondary state highway system for maintenance and construction by the Commonwealth?

Click to view

[ ] Yes

[ ] No”

The ballots shall be printed, marked, and counted and returns made and canvassed as in other elections and as provided in §

24.2-684

. The results shall be certified by the secretary of the appropriate electoral board to the State Board of Elections, to the court ordering the election, and to such other authority as may be proper to accomplish the purpose of the election. All other proceedings in connection with any such election shall be in conformity with the proceedings prescribed in § 11 of Chapter 415 of the Acts of Assembly of 1932.

History.

Code 1950, § 33-54; 1970, c. 322, § 33.1-86; 2014, c. 805.

§ 33.2-345.
Effect of election to determine return to the secondary state highway system.

If the result of an election pursuant to §

33.2-344

is in favor of the county returning to the secondary state highway system, such county shall, after the entry by the court of an order so declaring the result of such election and on and after the first day of July next succeeding, be within the secondary state highway system as fully and completely as if it had not withdrawn. All provisions of this article shall thereupon apply to and be enforced as to such county to the same extent as if the dates in Chapter 415 of the Acts of Assembly of 1932 had been changed to correspond with the year in which such county returns to the secondary state highway system. Such county shall not be allowed again to withdraw from the secondary state highway system.

History.

Code 1950, § 33-55; 1970, c. 322, § 33.1-87; 2014, c. 805.

§ 33.2-346.
Machinery, etc., owned by returning county.

The Commissioner of Highways shall, as promptly as practicable, make an inventory and appraisal of all road machinery, equipment, teams, material, and supplies on hand or belonging to the local highway authorities of any county that returns to the secondary state highway system or any district thereof that may be deemed by him suitable for work on the secondary state highway system and shall file such inventory and appraisal with the Board. The local highway authorities may, if they so elect, turn over to the Commonwealth such road machinery, equipment, teams, material, and supplies at the appraised value thereof, which shall be paid within two years out of funds available for expenditure on highways in the secondary state highway system, or, if they so prefer, the local highway authorities may retain or sell any of such property otherwise or, if they so elect, may turn over to the Commissioner of Highways all or any of such property for use upon the secondary state highway system without reimbursement therefor. Any sums received by the local highway authorities under the provisions of this section shall, so far as may be necessary, be applied on account of obligations previously contracted for county or district highway purposes and the balance, if any, for general county purposes.

History.

Code 1950, § 33-56; 1970, c. 322, § 33.1-88; 2014, c. 805.